hunspell/spanish.aff
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		arrar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		arrear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		arrestar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		arropar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		artar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		arzar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		asar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ascar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		asear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		asonar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		aspear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		astar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		atacar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		atar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ataviar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		atear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		atificar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		atillar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		atizar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		atollar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		atorar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		atuar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		autar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		avar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ayar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		azar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		bajar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		balar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		balizar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		bañar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		bar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		baratar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		bear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		bernar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		betear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		biar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		bijar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		bilar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		billar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		binar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		blar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		bletear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		bolar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		bonear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		borar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		borear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		borrar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		botar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		botear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		botonar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		brar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		brear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		bromar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		bujar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cabestrar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cachetear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		calar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		calificar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		calzar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cañar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		canear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		canizar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cansar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		capitular
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		car
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		carar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cardar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cascar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		catear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ccionar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cebadar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cebar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		celar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cenar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cepar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cepcionar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cerar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cercar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		char
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		chear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		chichear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		chinar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		chuchear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ciar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cidar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cificar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cifrar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ciguatar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cinar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cionar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		citar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		clamar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		clar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		clavar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cocear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cogollar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		colar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		colgar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		comenzar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		comodar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		comulgar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		conear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		conectar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		congojar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		consolar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		convocar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		copiar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		corar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		corchar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cordar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cordelar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		coriar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cornar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		corvar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		coscar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cotizar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		covar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		criminar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ctar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cturar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cuar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cuestar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cuidar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cular
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cultar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cunar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		cursar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		dar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		dear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		decorar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		delar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		denciar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		derar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		derezar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		desalar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		diar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		dibujar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		dicar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		dificar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		dillar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		dinar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		dizar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		doblar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		donar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		dorar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		dosar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		dramatizar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		drar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ducar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		dular
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ebar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ecar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		eccionar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ecear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ecentar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		echar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		echugar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		eclinar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ectar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		edar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		eficiar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		egar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		egrar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ejar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		elar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		elear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		elegar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		elizar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ellar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		emar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ematizar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ementar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		eminar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		emnizar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		emorizar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		emplazar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		empotrar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		enar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		encaminar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		encar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		enciar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		encolar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		encorvar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		endar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		endosar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		enfocar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		enganchar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		engar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		enjaezar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		enjalmar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		enladrillar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		enlutar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		enredar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		entalizar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		entar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		entear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		enunciar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		erar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		erchar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		erdear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		erear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		erezar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		erizar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ermanar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		erminar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ernar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		errar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		errear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ersar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ertar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ervar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		esar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		esgar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		esinar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		esionar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		espabilar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		esposar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		espuntar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		estallar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		estañar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		estar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		estrar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		etar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		etear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		etizar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		eudar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		evar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		exionar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ezar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		far
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		fatar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		fear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ferenciar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ficar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ficiar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		filar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		finar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		flar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		flexionar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		formar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		fregar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		gar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		garbar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		gastar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		gerar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		giar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		gmar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		gnificar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		gobernar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		gojar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		gollar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		gotar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		gotear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		graciar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		gradar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		grar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		gresar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		gualar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		guar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		guazar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		guear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		guizgar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		gularizar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		gurar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		habilitar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		habitar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		hechar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		herrumbrar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		hinar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		hincar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		honrar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		hornar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		huchear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		huecar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		huevar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ializar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		iañar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		iar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ibar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ibrar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ibular
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		icar
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		ichear
SFX V		 ar		 ábamos		iciar
