hunspell/spanish.dic
abandalizar/V
abastecer/V
abetuñar/V
abocinar/V
aborregar/V
abrocar/V
abstar/V
aburrar/V
acalenturar/V
acañonear/V
acatarrar/V
acepar/V
achantar/V
acidar/V
acomunar/V
acotejar/V
acudiar/V
adivinar/V
aducar/V
afilalápizar/V
afr/V
agigantar/V
aguacatear/V
ahelear/V
ajardiñar/V
albacar/V
alejandribir/V
alhenar/V
almadraber/V
altavozar/V
amanojar/V
ametrallar/V
amorrar/V
amustiar/V
aniñar/V
antevear/V
anublar/V
aparrar/V
apesgar/V
apoderar/V
apriscar/V
arar/V
aridecer/V
arredilar/V
arrocar/V
asardiñar/V
asimplar/V
asumar/V
atapar/V
atestar/V
atrincar/V
autodocumentar/V
aventurinar/V
azogar/V
bagrater/V
ballocar/V
bardagr/V
bastonear/V
bellaquear/V
bicomponer/V
birlar/V
blocar/V
boquihender/V
bravar/V
bruñar/V
buscarruir/V
cabuyereír/V
calar/V
calumñir/V
canciller/V
capitular/V
carcomer/V
carta-ordar/V
catapultar/V
cebadar/V
cenchar/V
ceroleinar/V
chalar/V
char/V
chiquirritiñir/V
chupalampar/V
cinquir/V
citrobácter/V
cáncañar/V
codificar/V
colegar/V
comedir/V
compensar/V
compulsar/V
concuerdar/V
confluiar/V
connaturalizar/V
consumir/V
contrader/V
contrapunzar/V
convexidar/V
corchear/V
correspondar/V
cotizar/V
crocoitar/V
cuajalechar/V
cucir/V
curiar/V
debier/V
decusar/V
delatorar/V
denudir/V
derrotar/V
desacreditar/V
desalbardar/V
desapadrinar/V
desarrumar/V
desatufer/V
descabezar/V
descaudalar/V
descogotar/V
desconocir/V
descrismar/V
desechar/V
desempegar/V
desencuadrnar/V
desenmarañar/V
desescombrar/V
desgasificar/V
deshonrar/V
deslenguar/V
desmarañar/V
desmír/V
despalmar/V
desperdicer/V
despliegar/V
desquilatar/V
destilar/V
desurdir/V
detasar/V
devorer/V
diezmar/V
dinamar/V
discutender/V
displazcar/V
doctorer/V
dragontear/V
editorializar/V
elucubrar/V
embaír/V
embolismar/V
embuchar/V
emparejar/V
empinar/V
empriner/V
encabalgar/V
encapillar/V
encenaguar/V
enclocar/V
encorvar/V
endemoniar/V
enfilar/V
engarabatir/V
engrescar/V
enjebar/V
enmarañar/V
enrayar/V
ensalivarar/V
ensogar/V
entiñir/V
entrelistar/V
entristezar/V
envarar/V
enzurizar/V
escabechar/V
escarapelar/V
escondir/V
escupir/V
espantar/V
espodumenar/V
estamperar/V
estipular/V
estrllar/V
evadar/V
exheredar/V
explorar/V
extorsionar/V
fachendear/V
faqueñir/V
felposar/V
filosofar/V
fláccer/V
forcir/V
fragmentar/V
frigorificar/V
fumigar/V
gallipavar/V
garlopar/V
gemípar/V
glandular/V
gorgir/V
grateñir/V
guabir/V
guedejar/V
hachear/V
hectiquecer/V
herrumbrar/V
hilachar/V
homenajear/V
hoscar/V
hurgonear/V
imar/V
importunidar/V
incensar/V
incumbir/V
infebrilar/V
ingresar/V
inmunoincompetenciar/V
insíper/V
interlocutoriar/V
intrapulpar/V
investir/V
iterar/V
jardinerar/V
judaizar/V
lañar/V
lambir/V
laríngear/V
lechugar/V
levirrostrar/V
limar/V
liudar/V
lokayatar/V
luxar/V
mañer/V
malear/V
mampirlar/V
manjorrar/V
maridar/V
matizar/V
medular/V
mercerizar/V
mezquindar/V
minar/V
mocear/V
monócular/V
morcellar/V
movicionar/V
multimillonar/V
nabor/V
neogregar/V
nitroparafinar/V
noyar/V
obnubilar/V
odeonar/V
ondular/V
orificar/V
oxidar/V
paletear/V
pantómetrar/V
parasemar/V
parátrofar/V
patitiesar/V
pedestrar/V
penitenciar/V
perforar/V
persistar/V
phir/V
pimpollear/V
pispar/V
plaqueñir/V
pánazar/V
poller/V
portacinchar/V
potar/V
preceder/V
prefigurar/V
prepondeer/V
primipar/V
profesar/V
propagar/V
protomartir/V
pulcar/V
quebrar/V
quintaesenciar/V
radioguiar/V
rasear/V
reafirmar/V
rebosar/V
recauchutar/V
recolectar/V
recontar/V
recuabrir/V
reducir/V
reforcer/V
regar/V
rehusar/V
relatar/V
remilgar/V
renegar/V
repercutiar/V
repugnar/V
resentar/V
restar/V
retobar/V
reuñir/V
revolotear/V
rimbombar/V
robustezar/V
roturar/V
rutilar/V
sagitar/V
salseretar/V
sanmartinar/V
señalar/V
semicorchear/V
sepiolar/V
sexagenar/V
silenciar/V
soar/V
sobrellenar/V
sofar/V
solventar/V
sotabatir/V
submarinar/V
subvencionar/V
sultar/V
surar/V
tabernar/V
tamborear/V
tartajear/V
telesquir/V
terebrantar/V
tijeretar/V
tímedir/V
tosiar/V
tramar/V
transmudar/V
trasformar/V
trastabillar/V
trencillar/V
trinchar/V
tropiecer/V
tupirar/V
ulitir/V
unzar/V
vadear/V
vastar/V
ventrudir/V
vestir/V
vindicar/V
vocoder/V
xerófitar/V
zalear/V
zompir/V
